Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.470

Receivership—Accounting of acts and expenditures by receiver.

The receiver shall render to the court an accounting of acts performed and expenditures made during the receivership. Nothing in this section relieves a court-appointed receiver from the responsibility of making all reports and certifications to the department required by law and regulation relating to the receiver's operation of the nursing home, the care of its residents, and participation in the medicaid program, if any.

[ 1987 c 476 s 16.]